Utah statutes.
59-7-801.   Definitions.
For purposes of this part:
(1)  "Unrelated business income" means unrelated business income as determined
under Section 512, Internal Revenue Code.
(2)  "Utah unrelated business income" means the unrelated business income
apportioned to Utah in accordance with Part 3, Allocation and Apportionment of
Income - Utah UDITPA Provisions.
